Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2668.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Appropriation; state treasurer; broadband infrastructure; cities and towns The sum of $5,000,000 is appropriated from the state general fund in fiscal year 2026-2027 to the state treasurer to distribute as grants for broadband infrastructure to cities and towns in this state with a population of less than one hundred thousand persons.